Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.305.130

Powers and duties—Purpose.

The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:

(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public business;

(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently conduct the work of the board;

(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding the work of the board;

(4) Establish and enforce minimum high school graduation requirements;

(5) For purposes of statewide accountability:

(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading, writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998, each as amended. The goals may be established for all students, economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient students, students with disabilities, and students who are not meeting academic standards as defined in RCW 28A.165.015, disaggregated as described in RCW 28A.300.042(1) for student-level data. The board may establish school and school district goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for students in grades seven through 12. The board shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature;

(b)(i)(A) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the standard on the statewide student assessment, and the SAT or the ACT if used to demonstrate career and college readiness under RCW 28A.230.710. The board shall also determine student scores that identify levels of student performance below and beyond the standard. The board shall set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that may be established for this purpose;

(B) To permit the legislature to take any statutory action it deems warranted before modified or newly established scores are implemented, the board shall notify the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate of any scores that are modified or established under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection on or after July 28, 2019. The notifications required by this subsection (5)(b)(i)(B) must be provided by November 30th of the year proceeding the beginning of the school year in which the modified or established scores will take effect;

(ii) The legislature intends to continue the implementation of chapter 22, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. when the legislature expressed the intent for the state board of education to identify the student performance standard that demonstrates a student's career and college readiness for the 11th grade consortium-developed assessments. Therefore, by December 1, 2018, the state board of education, in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction, must identify and report to the governor and the education policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the equivalent student performance standard that a 10th grade student would need to achieve on the state assessments to be on track to be career and college ready at the end of the student's high school experience;

(iii) The legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards and any changes made to the elementary, middle, and high school level performance standards. The board must provide an explanation of and rationale for all initial performance standards and any changes, for all grade levels of the statewide student assessment. If the board changes the performance standards for any grade level or subject, the superintendent of public instruction must recalculate the results from the previous 10 years of administering that assessment regarding students below, meeting, and beyond the state standard, to the extent that this data is available, and post a comparison of the original and recalculated results on the superintendent's website;

(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and

(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035, information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals adopted by the board;

(6) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through 12. However, no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten program only and no private school shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school officials;

(7) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;

(8) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and

(9) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

[ 2024 c 66 s 13; 2021 c 111 s 10; 2019 c 252 s 112; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 31 s 3; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 7; 2011 1st sp.s. c 6 s 1; 2009 c 548 s 502; 2008 c 27 s 1; 2006 c 263 s 102; 2005 c 497 s 104; 2002 c 205 s 3; 1997 c 13 s 5; 1996 c 83 s 1; 1995 c 369 s 9; 1991 c 116 s 11; 1990 c 33 s 266. Prior: 1987 c 464 s 1; 1987 c 39 s 1; prior: 1986 c 266 s 86; 1986 c 149 s 3; 1984 c 40 s 2; 1979 ex.s. c 173 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 92 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 50; 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 215 s 1; 1971 c 48 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.120; prior: 1963 c 32 s 1; 1961 c 47 s 1; prior: (i) 1933 c 80 s 1; 1915 c 161 s 1; 1909 c 97 p 236 s 5; 1907 c 240 s 3; 1903 c 104 s 12; 1897 c 118 s 27; 1895 c 150 s 1; 1890 p 352 s 8; Code 1881 s 3165; RRS s 4529. (ii) 1919 c 89 s 3; RRS s 4684. (iii) 1909 c 97 p 238 s 6; 1897 c 118 s 29; RRS s 4530. Formerly RCW 28A.04.120, 28.04.120, 28.58.280, 28.58.281, 28.58.282, 43.63.140.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2021 c 111: See notes following RCW 28A.300.139.

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 31: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [July 7, 2017]." [ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 31 s 8.]

Findings—Intent—2013 2nd sp.s. c 22: See note following RCW 28A.655.068.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 6: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 31, 2011]." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 6 s 2.]

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: "(1)(a) The legislature intends to develop a system in which the state and school districts share accountability for achieving state educational standards and supporting continuous school improvement. The legislature recognizes that comprehensive education finance reform and the increased investment of public resources necessary to implement that reform must be accompanied by a new mechanism for clearly defining the relationships and expectations for the state, school districts, and schools. It is the legislature's intent that this be accomplished through the development of a proactive, collaborative accountability system that focuses on a school improvement system that engages and serves the local school board, parents, students, staff in the schools and districts, and the community. The improvement system shall be based on progressive levels of support, with a goal of continuous improvement in student achievement and alignment with the federal system of accountability.

(b) The legislature further recognizes that it is the state's responsibility to provide schools and districts with the tools and resources necessary to improve student achievement. These tools include the necessary accounting and data reporting systems, assessment systems to monitor student achievement, and a system of general support, targeted assistance, recognition, and, if necessary, state intervention.

(2) The legislature has already charged the state board of education to develop criteria to identify schools and districts that are successful, in need of assistance, and those where students persistently fail, as well as to identify a range of intervention strategies and a performance incentive system. The legislature finds that the state board of education should build on the work that the board has already begun in these areas. As development of these formulas, processes, and systems progresses, the legislature should monitor the progress." [ 2009 c 548 s 501.]

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Effective date—2005 c 497 ss 104, 302, 402, and 406 through 408: "Sections 104, 302, 402, and 406 through 408 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2005." [ 2005 c 497 s 410.]

Intent—Part headings not law—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Findings—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 205 ss 2, 3, and 4: See notes following RCW 28A.320.125.

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—1984 c 40: See note following RCW 28A.195.050.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 92: "If any provision of this 1976 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 92 s 6.]

Districts to develop programs and establish programs regarding child abuse and neglect prevention: RCW 28A.225.200.

Professional certification not required of superintendents or deputy or assistant superintendents: RCW 28A.410.120.

Sexual abuse of students, child abuse, and neglect—Coordinated prevention program: RCW 28A.300.160.

Use of force on children—Policy—Actions presumed unreasonable: RCW 9A.16.100.